North Dakota, session 69, SB2082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 37-17.1-07.1 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. Establishment of funds.
a. There is created in the state treasury a nonlapsing restricted account to be known as a
state hazardous chemicals preparedness and response fund. The fund consists of
revenue collected from the state hazardous chemical fee system and funds appropriated
by the legislative assembly. Moneys in the fund shall be appropriated biennially to the
division of homeland security for carrying out the purposes, goals, and objectives of
SARA title III, and the state hazardous chemicals preparedness and response program.
b. The county treasurer of each county shall establish a nonlapsing restricted account, to be
known as the county hazardous chemicals preparedness and response account. The
county hazardous chemicals preparedness and response account consists of revenue
from the state hazardous chemicals fee system, county, federal or state funds, grants,
and any private donations provided to finance the county hazardous chemicals
preparedness and response program.
c. The director of the division of homeland security shall set appropriate fees for the state
hazardous chemical fee system subject to the following:
(1) Changes to fees charged will take effect on January first;
(2) An increase to fees levied on a per chemical basis made after January 1, 2026, may
not exceed five dollars per year;
(3) The director shall announce any fee increases made after January 1, 2026, a
minimum of one year before the effective date; and
(4) The director may consider economic conditions, the general economy, and the
availability of funds appropriated by the legislature to offset the costs of
administering the program when setting fees.
d. Each owner and operator of a facility, as defined in SARA title III, shall pay an annual
hazardous chemicals fee to the division of homeland security.
(1) The fee must be paid by March first of each year.
(2) The fee is twenty-five dollarslevied on a per chemical basis for each chemical within
the meaning of title 40, Code of Federal Regulations, part 355.20, or its successor
which is required under section 312 of SARA title III, to be listed on the hazardous
chemical inventory form (tier II) which the owner or operator must submit to the
division. The federal requirements must be used for completing the tier II form,

S. B. NO. 2082 - PAGE 2
including the threshold amounts, as outlined in title 40, Code of Federal
Regulations, part 20.
(3) The maximum fee for a facility under this section is four hundred seventy-fivenine
hundred fifty dollars.
(4) The director of the homeland security division may impose fees for both late filing of
reports and late payment of fees. subject to the following:
(a) A late fee must equalmay not exceed the amount of the hazardous chemicals
fee owed under this subdivision.;
(b) After six months the director shall process further violations under willful
violations in subsection 4.;and
(c) A facility exempt from fees under this subdivision which is late filing reports
under this section may be subject to a late fee equal to the amount the facility
would be charged if it was not exempt.
(5) The division of homeland security shall transfer to the county hazardous chemicals
preparedness and response account one-half of the regular fees collected from the
state's hazardous chemicals fee system.
d.e. The owners or operators of family farm enterprises that are not engaged in the retail or
wholesale of hazardous chemicals and facilities owned by the state or local governments
are exempt from the fee under subdivision c. For purposes of this section, the terms
"family farm" and "farmer" have the same meaning as set forth in section 6-09.11-01.
e.f. The stateState and county governments are authorized to accept and may deposit
grants, gifts, and federal funds into the hazardous chemicals preparedness and response
fund and accounts for the purpose of carrying out the hazardous chemicals
preparedness and response programs to include training, exercising, equipment,
response, and salaries, and local emergency planning committee member stipends not
to exceed thirty percent of state per diem per meeting attended. In lieu of stipends the
committee chairman may provide a meal or refreshments other than alcoholic beverages.
f.g. "Hazardous chemical" means as defined in title 40, Code of Federal Regulations, part
355.20 and title 29, Code of Federal Regulations, part 1910.1200.
g.h. The state hazardous chemicals fee system does not supersede a city fee system for
hazardous chemicals.

S. B. NO. 2082 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2082.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 81 Nays 11 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State